Louisiana, session 2026, HB814.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1 . Chapter 25 of Title 6 of the Louisiana Revised Statues of 1950, comprised
of R.S. 6:1431 through 1436 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 25: THE LOUISIANA COMMUNITY INVESTMENT FAIRNESS ACT
§1431. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Community
Investment Fairness Act" or "LA-CIFA".
§1432. Findings and purpose
A. The legislature finds that:
(1) State-chartered financial institutions receive substantial public benefits
including state deposit insurance backstops, access to the state's payment systems,
and tax advantages.
(2) Despite these public benefits, evidence demonstrates that state-chartered
institutions make significantly fewer loans per capita in predominantly minority and
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1291 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 814
low-to-moderate income, or LMI, communities than in predominantly white and
higher-income communities, a practice historically characterized as redlining.
(3) The federal Community Reinvestment Act of 1977 applies to federally
chartered institutions; however, state-chartered institutions not subject to federal
examination have demonstrated systematically lower community investment
performance.
(4) Louisiana has a compelling public interest in ensuring that institutions
receiving state privileges serve the communities in which they are chartered.
B. It is the purpose of this Chapter to encourage state-chartered financial
institutions to help meet the credit needs of the communities in which they are
chartered, consistent with safe and sound operation.
§1433. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Assessment area" means the geographic area in which a regulated
institution is obligated to demonstrate community investment performance, defined
as the parishes in which the institution maintains branches or offices.
(2) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the office of financial
institutions.
(3) "Community development activity" means:
(a) Loans, investments, or services that support affordable housing for LMI
individuals or families.
(b) Loans to small businesses and small farms in LMI census tracts or
majority-minority census tracts.
(c) Investments in or grants to community development financial institutions,
or CDFIs.
(d) Financial education and counseling services provided to LMI or minority
communities.
(e) Mortgage lending in majority-minority census tracts.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1291 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 814
(4) "LMI" means low-to-moderate income, defined as a census tract in which
the median household income is less than eighty percent of the area median income.
(5) "Majority-minority census tract" means a census tract in which more than
fifty percent of the population identifies as non-white.
(6) "Regulated institution" means any bank, savings institution, or credit
union chartered by this state with assets of one hundred million dollars or more.
§1434. Community investment examinations
A. The commissioner shall conduct a community investment examination
of each regulated institution no less than once every three years. Examinations shall
assess all of the following:
(1) The institution's record of lending to LMI borrowers and in LMI and
majority-minority census tracts within its assessment area, compared to:
(a) The institution's lending in non-LMI, non-minority census tracts.
(b) Demographic data on the composition of the institution's assessment
area.
(c) Aggregate lending by all institutions in the same assessment area.
(2) The institution's investments in community development activities as
defined in R.S. 6:1433.
(3) The provision of financial services and products accessible to LMI and
minority customers.
(4) Any formal complaints alleging discriminatory lending practices filed
during the examination period.
B. Following each examination, the commissioner shall assign the institution
one of the following ratings:
(1) Outstanding: The institution's community investment performance is
exceptional and substantially exceeds peer benchmarks.
(2) Satisfactory: The institution's performance meets community needs and
satisfies the requirements of this Chapter.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1291 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 814
(3) Needs to Improve: The institution's performance falls below peer
benchmarks and requires corrective action.
(4) Substantial Noncompliance: The institution has failed to meet its
community investment obligations and demonstrates a pattern of discriminatory or
exclusionary lending.
§1435. Public disclosure of ratings
A. The commissioner shall make all community investment examination
reports and ratings publicly available within sixty days of the completion of each
examination, including publication on the office of financial institutions' website.
B. Each regulated institution shall post its current community investment
rating in a conspicuous location in each branch, on its website, and in its annual
report to depositors.
C. The commissioner shall publish an annual statewide community
investment report summarizing the performance of all regulated institutions.
§1436. Consequences of ratings
A. A regulated institution rated "Needs to Improve" shall do all of the
following:
(1) Submit a corrective action plan to the commissioner within ninety days,
describing specific steps to improve community investment performance.
(2) Meet with the commissioner or his designee within sixty days to discuss
deficiencies.
(3) Undergo an accelerated examination within eighteen months.
B. The commissioner shall consider a regulated institution's community
investment rating in reviewing and acting upon applications by the institution for:
(1) New branch openings or closures in this state.
(2) Merger or acquisition approvals.
(3) Conversion of charter type.
(4) Other actions requiring commissioner approval.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1291 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 814
C. A regulated institution rated "Substantial Noncompliance" for two
consecutive examination cycles may be subject to all of the following:
(1) Denial or conditioning of any pending application for which
commissioner approval is required.
(2) Required divestiture of state-funded deposits held by state agencies, if
the commissioner determines such action is appropriate to protect the public interest.
(3) Referral to the attorney general for investigation of potential fair lending
violations.